Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-339
State park system; established; areas included; administration.

(1) The state park system hereby established shall consist of existing and acquired areas determined and designated by the commission as properly falling in one of the following classes: State parks, state recreation areas, and state historical parks.

(2) The commission shall be charged with the responsibility for the establishment and conduct of the state park system and all things pertaining thereto. The state park system shall be administered through a Division of State Parks hereby established within the commission to be headed by a division chief who has been selected for this purpose and who has an appropriate background in this field. The division chief shall be appointed by the commission and shall receive such salary as the commission shall determine.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 3, p. 1465;

Laws 1978, LB 613, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 610, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.23;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 97.